Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-679
Short-time compensation program; individual;
eligibility.

An
individual is eligible to receive short-time compensation with respect to
any week only if the individual is monetarily eligible for unemployment compensation,
not otherwise disqualified for unemployment compensation, and:

(1) During the
week, the individual is employed as a member of an affected unit under an
approved short-time compensation plan, which was approved prior to that week,
and the plan is in effect with respect to the week for which short-time compensation
is claimed;

(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Employment Security
Law relating to availability for work and actively seeking work, the individual
is available for the individual's usual hours of work with the short-time
compensation employer, which may include, for purposes of this section, participating
in training to enhance job skills that is approved by the commissioner such
as employer-sponsored training or training funded under the federal Workforce
Investment Act of 1998, 29 U.S.C. 2801 et seq.; and

(3) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, an individual covered by a short-time compensation
plan is deemed unemployed in any week during the duration of such plan if
the individual's remuneration as an employee in an affected unit is reduced
based on a reduction of the individual's usual weekly hours of work under
an approved short-time compensation plan.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 20.